Utah statutes.
32A-9-101.   Commission's power to issue licenses.
(1)  The commission may issue liquor warehousing licenses for the warehousing,
distribution, and transportation of liquor.
(2)  A person may not warehouse, distribute, or transport liquor for resale to
wholesale or retail customers unless the person is issued a warehousing
license by the commission.  A separate license is required for each
warehousing facility.  Violation of this subsection is a class B misdemeanor.
(3)  The commission may prescribe by policy, directive, or rule, consistent
with this title, the general operational requirements of licensees relating
to:
(a)  physical facilities;
(b)  conditions of storage, distribution, or transport of liquor; and
(c)  other matters considered appropriate by the commission.
